Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 10. Capital Construction Projects

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 81, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 81, § 2, provides:

“The joint appropriations interim committee shall study the impacts of the statutory changes under this act and shall propose permanent changes to contractor preference laws consistent with this act.
The committee shall further propose changes to the resident preference laws as it determines necessary to effectively enforce those laws and to deter violations of those provisions.
The committee shall present its recommendations for consideration in the 2012 budget session.”

§ 16-6-1001.
Capital construction projects restrictions; preference requirements; waivers.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, any funds appropriated to or authorized for expenditure by a public entity for capital construction projects shall be subject to the restrictions of this section which shall be construed where possible as complimentary and consistent with other statutory requirements relating to competitive bidding and contractor preferences. To the extent the restrictions in this section are inconsistent with other state statutes, this section shall supersede all such inconsistent provisions and shall govern. This section shall be applied as follows:

This paragraph shall apply to any alternate design and construction delivery method as defined in W.S. 16-6-701(a)(v):

All contracts shall require the construction manager at risk or design builder to conduct an open bid process in compliance with Wyoming contractor preference laws before awarding any subcontracts for work covered under the contract;

Unless exempted pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph the construction manager at risk or design builder shall award to responsible Wyoming resident contractors not less than seventy percent (70%) of the work covered by the manager’s or builder’s contract. As used in this subparagraph “work covered” shall be calculated using the total contract price and the total of payments made to all subcontractors under the contract, including materials but excluding from both amounts the price for any part of the contract for which a waiver is provided under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

The requirement of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph may be waived for any part of the subcontract work to be performed under the contract. If waived in part, the remaining value of the total subcontract work to be performed under the contract is subject to and shall be used to calculate compliance with the requirement of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph. A waiver shall require a written determination that:

The work to be performed is specialized or of such a scale that it can be more suitably performed by out-of-state contractors;

The bid amounts submitted by responsible Wyoming subcontractors exceed one hundred five percent (105%) of the costs of out-of-state providers for equivalent quality of work or services;

The enforcement of the requirement would unreasonably delay completion of construction; or

There were insufficient responsible Wyoming contractors submitting bids to make the seventy percent (70%) requirement.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 2.

Any waiver shall be approved in writing by the following persons:

For projects to be completed by the state of Wyoming, by the director of the state construction department;

For projects to be completed by the University of Wyoming, by the president of the university and the chairman of the board of trustees;

For projects subject to review by the state construction department under title 21 of Wyoming statutes, by the director of the state construction department and the chairman of the board of the school facilities commission;

For projects completed by a community college, by the community college president and its chairman of the board of trustees;

For all other projects, by the respective governing body.

Any approved waiver shall be documented in writing and provided to the governor. Notice of all approved waivers shall also be published on a website maintained by the state construction department, including a statement of the grounds for the waiver.

Unless exempted pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, this paragraph shall apply to all construction delivery methods:

The procurement of furniture and movable equipment shall be done by competitive bid based upon:

Specifications written for products that are available from Wyoming resident suppliers; or

If specified products are not available from any Wyoming resident supplier, specifications addressing performance standards and functional requirements determined by the public entity. The public entity may specify suggested individual brands or manufacturers, provided that similar products that meet or exceed specifications shall be accepted as substitute products. Specified products that are not available to any responsible Wyoming resident suppliers shall not be used in any group or package within the bid documents which would exclude responsible Wyoming resident suppliers from submitting a bid on the final bid package.

No person who was employed by the public entity to prepare the bid documents, whether with or without compensation, shall be eligible to bid on the final bid package;

A five percent (5%) preference shall be granted to responsible Wyoming resident suppliers for procurements by public entities and that are used in and incorporated into a capital construction project;

The requirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be waived by a political subdivision of the state for furniture or movable equipment upon a written determination that the furniture or movable equipment requirements of the project are so specialized or that an item or type of furniture or movable equipment is so unique or uncommon that failure to waive the requirements would materially impair the functionality of the project. Waivers under this subparagraph shall be approved by the governing body of the political subdivision.

All bids shall be opened in public at a location designated by the public entity soliciting the bid. This paragraph shall apply to all construction delivery methods;

Contractor progress payments shall be made only in accordance with this paragraph. If a public entity determines that a general contractor in good standing on a project requires a progress payment due for work completed in a workmanlike manner in order to pay a materialman, subcontractor or laborer for their work performed to date, the entity may issue the progress payment upon verification that all materialmen, subcontractors and laborers have been paid for completed work through the date of the most recent previous progress payment, less any contracted amounts lawfully held for retainage. If a progress payment has been withheld by a general contractor due to a reasonable dispute between a general contractor and a materialman or subcontractor, the claimant may present a claim in the disputed amount against the general contractor’s surety bond under the provisions of W.S.

16-6-117

. A person submitting false information regarding a progress payment subject to this paragraph shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

16-6-120

.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 31, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch 134, § 2.

As used in this section:

“Capital construction project” means new construction, demolition, renovation and capital renewal of or to any public building or facility and any other public improvement necessary for the public building or facility, major maintenance as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(v) and major building and facility repair and replacement as defined in W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii);

“Public entity” means as defined in W.S. 16-6-101(a)(viii).

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 81, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 106, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 82, § 1, effective March 4, 2016; 2019 ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 129, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 31, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendments. —

The first
2012 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” twice in (c).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 106, §§ 1 and 2, in the introductory language of (a), added “legislatively appropriated” and “or ending June 30, 2014”; substituted “covered under the contract” for “to be performed for the project” in (a)(i)(A); in (a)(i)(B), substituted “work covered by the manager's or builder's contract” for “value of the total subcontract work to be performed for the project,” and added the present last sentence; rewrote the introductory language of (a)(i)(C); repealed former (a)(i)(C)(V), which read: “If the requirement of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph is waived in part, the remaining value of the total subcontract work to be performed for the project is subject to the requirement of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph”; substituted “department” for “commission” in (a)(i)(D)(III); deleted “and the joint appropriations interim committee” at the end of (a)(i)(E); substituted “and movable” for “fixtures and” or variants in (a)(ii)(A) and (D); added the present last sentence in (a)(iii); rewrote (a)(iv); deleted “and the joint appropriations interim committee” after “to the governor” in (b); in (c), substituted “entity” for “agency” throughout, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” throughout, and added the present last sentence; substituted “June 30, 2014” for “June 30, 2012” in (e); and made stylistic changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “legislatively appropriated” and “during the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2012 or ending June 30, 2014, which have not been encumbered, obligated by contract or designed as of January 17, 2011” in the first sentence of in the introductory language of (a); added the second sentence of (a)(i)(E); inserted “by public entities” and “and that are used and incorporated into a public capital construction project” in (a)(ii)(C); and substituted “at a location designated by the public entity” for “in an office of the agency” in (a)(iii); and repealed (e) which read: “This section is repealed effective June 30, 2014.”.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, substituted “Specifications of product” for “Generic” in (a)(ii)(A)(I), and at the end of (a)(ii)(A)(II), substituted “The agency may specify suggested individual brands or manufacturers, provided that similar products that meet or exceed specifications and that have been approved by the agency shall be accepted as substitute bid items. Specified products that are not available to any responsible Wyoming resident suppliers shall not be used in any group or package within the bid documents which would exclude responsible Wyoming resident suppliers from submitting a bid on the final bid package. As used in this subdivision, ‘agency’ means any department, agency or other instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state to which funds are appropriated or authorized for expenditure for capital construction projects and includes any entity that the agency contracts with to administer or award any bid” for “but without specification of individual brands or manufacturers” and made a related change.

Laws 2016, ch. 82, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 4, 2016.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 105 § 3, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(i)(D)(I) substituted “state construction department” for “department of administration and information”; rewrote (a)(i)(D)(III), which formerly read, “For projects subject to review by the school facilities department, by the director of the school facilities commission and the chairman of the board of the school facilities commission”; and in (a)(i)(E), substituted “state construction department” for “construction management division of the department of administration and information.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i)(D)(II), substituted “chairman” for “president.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 129, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in introductory language in (a)(ii)(A), deleted “either,” in (a)(ii)(A)(I), substituted “written for products that are available from Wyoming resident suppliers” for “of product,” in (a)(ii)(A)(II), added “If specified products are not available from any Wyoming resident supplier” to the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “exceed specifications” for “exceed specifications and that have been approved by the agency” and “products” for “bid items” in the second sentence, in (a)(ii)(D), deleted “or (B),” added “by a political subdivision of the state” preceding “for furniture,” and substituted “by the governing body of the political subdivision” for “by the persons listed in subparagraph (a)(i)(D) of this section and are subject to subparagraph (a)(i)(E) of this section.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “appropriated to or authorized for expenditure by a public entity” for “appropriated or authorized for expenditure”; in (a)(ii)(A)(II) and (a)(ii)(B) substituted “public entity” for “agency”; in (a)(ii)(A)(II) deleted the last sentence, which read “As used in this subdivision, “agency” means any department, agency or other instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state to which funds are appropriated or authorized for expenditure for capital construction projects and includes any entity that the agency contracts with to administer or award any bid”; in (a)(ii)(C) deleted “subject to this paragraph” after “public entities” and substituted “capital” for “public capital”; in (a)(iv) substituted “public entity” for “contracting entity,” added “less any contracted amounts lawfully held for retainage” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “the claimant may present a claim in the disputed amount against the general contractor's surety bond” for “or laborer, further progress payments shall not be paid to the general contractor but shall be retained in accordance with the guidelines addressing disputed final payments,” and made stylistic changes; repealed (b) through (d); and added (f).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 129, § 2, provides: “This act shall only apply to the procurement of products on or after July 1, 2019.”